Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3514
Violation of act; remedies.

Whenever, in the judgment of the department, any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any acts or practices which constitute or will constitute a violation of any provision of the Radiation Control Act or any rule, regulation, or order issued pursuant to the act, the Attorney General or any county attorney may make application to the district court for an order enjoining such acts or practices or for an order directing compliance, and upon a showing by the department that such person has engaged or is about to engage in any such acts or practices, a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or other order may be granted.

Laws 1963, c. 406, § 14, p. 1305;

Laws 1987, LB 390, § 17.